src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_HARRAS
[CMP=POS]:ras A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ras A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:taa    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ta    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_OHUT
[CMP=POS]:t A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_EHYT
[CMP=POS]:t A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AINUT




[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

LEXICON A_KULUNUT
[CMP=POS]:ut     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ut    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:ee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ee    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_ÄLLISTYNYT
[CMP=POS]:yt A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:yt    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:e    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ee    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AHNE
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TERVE
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KADE
[CMP=POS]:de       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:det   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:tee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:de   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tee    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE    ;
0:te     A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HELLE
[CMP=POS]:le       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:let   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:tee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tee    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE    ;
0:te     A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PITKÄ




[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:tk    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:tk    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:tk    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:tk    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tkä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tk    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:te    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:de    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s     A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
